Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 256.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 69. Provide educational resources and technical assistance to school districts related to chartering career and technical student organizations that comply with the Carl D. Perkins Career and Technical Education Improvement Act of 2006, codified at 20 U.S.C. Â§2301 et seq., as amended, and rules adopted by the state board, including career and technical student organizations related to robotics and robotics teams and competitions. Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 280.13D High school athletic organizations ââ robotics. 1. An organization that receives moneys from a school district to pay dues or membership fees, or moneys from a nonpublic school originating from the state to pay dues or membership fees, may sponsor or administer interscholastic contests or competitions related to robotics. For purposes Senate File 278, p. 2 of this section, âorganizationâ means the same as defined in section 280.13. 2. This section shall not be construed to prohibit an organization from sponsoring or administering other interscholastic contests or competitions. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 278, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor